Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 4. Regional Native Housing Authorities.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Private leasehold interests in Regional Native Housing Authority or Alaska State Housing Authority projects which rely on federal funding do not appear to be subject to municipal property taxation.
July 24, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.55.995.
Purpose and intent.

The legislature finds that an acute shortage of housing and related facilities exists in the villages of the state and that adequate housing cannot be provided by the private sector due to the economic depression that exists in most villages of the state. It is the purpose and intent of the legislature to provide a means for certain Native associations to form public corporations with the powers and duties comparable to those provided in AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.960

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 123 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 151 SLA 1975; am § 74 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.996.
Creation of authorities.

The following associations are given the authority specified in (b) of this section:

Arctic Slope Native Association (Barrow and Point Hope);

Kawerak, Inc. (Seward Peninsula, Unalakleet, St. Lawrence Island);

Northwest Alaska Native Association (Kotzebue);

Association of Village Council Presidents (southwest coast of Alaska including all villages in the Bethel area and all villages on the Lower Yukon River and Lower Kuskokwim River);

Tanana Chiefs Conference (Koyukuk, the middle and upper Yukon River villages, and the upper Kuskokwim and Tanana River villages);

Cook Inlet Tribal Council (Kenai, Tyonek, Eklutna, and Seldovia);

Bristol Bay Native Association (Dillingham, Upper Alaska Peninsula);

Aleut League (Aleutian Islands, Pribilof Islands, and that part of the Alaska Peninsula that is in the Aleut League);

North Pacific Rim Native Corp. (Cordova, Tatitlek, Port Graham, English Bay, Valdez, Seward, Eyak, and Chenega);

Tlingit-Haida Central Council or Alaska Native Brotherhood (Southeastern Alaska);

Kodiak Area Native Association (all villages on and around Kodiak Island);

Copper River Native Association (Copper Center, Glennallen, Chitina, and Mentasta);

Alaska Federation of Natives, Inc.;

Sitka Community Association (Baranof and Japonski Island);

Metlakatla Indian Community (Metlakatla);

Ketchikan Indian Corporation (Ketchikan area, excluding Saxman).

There is created with respect to each of the associations named in (a) of this section a public body corporate and politic to function in the operating area of the individual associations to be known as the regional housing authority of the associations possessing all powers, rights, and functions now or subsequently specified under AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

, except those specified with respect to the construction and acquisition of public buildings for lease to the state or any authority that is inconsistent with AS

18.55.995

. A regional housing authority may enter into agreements with local government, other political subdivisions of the state, the state or the federal government for the exercise of a function or power relating to construction, operation, and maintenance of public facilities or public utilities. Upon execution of an agreement and for the period of the agreement the regional housing authority shall have the same powers and functions relating to the subject matter of the agreement as those that may legally be exercised by the governmental unit with whom the agreement is made including the authority to separately or together with the other unit borrow money and issue notes, bonds, or other evidence of indebtedness to finance a project within the scope of the agreement subject to the express limitations, if any, contained in the agreement. All obligations or liabilities of the regional housing authority shall remain their own and are not obligations or liabilities of the state.

A housing authority created by this section may not transact business or exercise powers granted to it until the governing body of the named association has, by proper resolution, declared that there is a need for the authority to function, gives it the authority to function and has named its commissioners as provided under (d) of this section.

The governing body of the association in question shall, after determining that it wishes to have a regional native housing authority, appoint five persons to serve as the board of commissioners of the authority. The term of office of each member is for three years except that, of the commissioners first appointed, one shall serve for a term of one year and two shall serve for a term of two years. Vacancies shall be filled by the governing body of the association in question.

Questions arising as to jurisdiction and boundary disputes as a result of the jurisdictional lines set out by (a) of this section shall be resolved by the governing board of the Alaska Federation of Natives.

The authority shall have the power to acquire, construct, operate, and maintain group homes, multipurpose community centers, child care centers, and other community facilities.

If an activity associated with the planning, financing, construction, or operation of a project by a regional housing authority established in this section and authorized under AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.290

conflicts with an activity of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, the governing body of the municipality in which the project is located shall resolve the conflict.

Before a contract for the construction, alteration, or repair of a housing unit constructed under a federal or state funded housing program is awarded, the regional housing authority shall require the contractors to comply with the bond provisions specified in AS

36.25.010

(a) and (b).

A housing authority created under this section shall have its financial records audited annually by an independent certified public accountant. The legislative auditor may prescribe the form and content of the financial records of the housing authority and shall have access to these records at any time.

History.

(§ 1 ch 123 SLA 1971; am §§ 3, 6 ch 151 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 274 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 1977; § 6 ch 86 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 128 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 1986; am §§ 75, 76 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 2000)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Pacific Rim Housing Authority appropriately may be considered a political subdivision of the state or other “related public entity” for purposes of Subpart F (15 CFR § 930.90) for the limited purpose of its receipt of federal grants for housing projects; and, thus, Pacific Rim is subject to the coastal management consistency review required by Subpart F for federal assistance programs to the extent that grants are used to fund housing and related programs which affect the coastal zone. April 30, 1981 Op. Att’y Gen.

While various specified Native associations are given authority to establish regional housing authorities under this section, and may receive donations of land from municipalities, the programs administered by those associations must be racially neutral.
May 6, 1981 Op. Att’y Gen.

Regional housing authorities created under this section are neither political subdivisions of the state nor state agencies.
June 8, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

It seems clear that the Department of Community and Regional Affairs is not charged with enforcing the audit requirement of subsection (i); and it is not clear who, if anyone, is so charged.
August 2, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Community and Regional Affairs can, under AS

18.55.998

, condition its grants to the regional authorities on the authorities’ compliance with subsection (i). August 2, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

It is quite clear that the annual audits of regional housing authorities mandated by subsection (i) cannot be funded by the Department of Community and Regional Affairs with the housing supplemental development fund moneys; and it must be concluded that department fund should not be used for post-project cost certification. August 2, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.55.997.
Residential loans.

In addition to the powers authorized to a regional housing authority under AS

18.55.996

, a regional housing authority may, in accordance with procedures and policies adopted and approved by the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, make loans for the purchase or development of residential housing in rural areas of the state, other than in an area where the corporation has a loan office. A loan shall be secured by collateral in an amount acceptable to the corporation. The rate of interest on a loan authorized by this section may not exceed the interest rate on a loan originated or purchased under AS

18.56.400

—

18.56.600

.

In this section,

“development” means the construction of a new residence or the repair, remodeling, rehabilitation, or expansion of an existing home;

“rural” has the meaning given the term “small community” in AS

18.56.600

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 167 SLA 1978; am § 14 ch 113 SLA 1982; am E.O. No. 69 § 2 (1988); am §§ 77, 78 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For housing assistance loan fund, see 15 AAC 152, art. 1.

Sec. 18.55.998.
Supplemental housing development grants.

There is created in the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation a supplemental housing development grant fund. Using corporate earnings or other available funds, the corporation shall make grants to regional housing authorities established under AS

18.55.996

for the cost of on-site sewer and water facilities, road construction to project sites, energy efficient design features in homes, and extension of electrical distribution facilities to individual residences.

A grant may be made only for residential housing for which federal loan or grant approval has been obtained from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and which will be made available to the public on a nondiscriminatory basis. A grant may not be used to retire or repay obligations or debts of the grant recipient. A grant may only be for the difference between the maximum amount available under federal law or regulation for construction of the residential housing for which the grant is made and the actual costs of the construction. A grant may not exceed 20 percent of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development total development cost per unit in effect at the time the grant is made.

Grant money may be used only for the purposes specified in (a) of this section. No part of the grant money may be used for administrative or other costs of a regional housing authority whether the costs are directly associated with the construction or general costs of the authority.

The Alaska Housing Finance Corporation shall adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this section. The provisions of AS

18.56.088(a)

and (b) apply to regulations adopted under this section.

In order to make grants authorized by (a) of this section in its administration of the supplemental housing development grant fund established by this section, the board of directors of the corporation shall identify in the corporation’s proposed operating budget the money available to the corporation, including the corporation’s own assets, to supplement available federal development money.

History.

(§ 7 ch 86 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 97 SLA 1988; am §§ 79 — 81 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and policy in connection with the 1988 amendment to (a) of this section, see sec. 1, ch. 97, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For further limitations on the use of corporate earnings or other available funds of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation to make supplemental housing development grants, see AS

18.56.089

.

Administrative Code. —

For supplemental housing development grants, see 15 AAC 154, art. 4.

Legislative history reports. —

For House letter of intent in connection with ch. 97, SLA 1988 (CSSB 308(C&RA)), see 1988 House Journal 3601.

Opinions of attorney general. —

It seems clear that the Department of Community and Regional Affairs is not charged with enforcing the audit requirement of AS

18.55.996(i)

; and it is not clear who, if anyone, is so charged.
August 2, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

It is quite clear that the annual audits of regional housing authorities mandated by AS

18.55.996(i)

cannot be funded by the Department of Community and Regional Affairs with housing supplemental development fund moneys; and it must be concluded that department fund should not be used for post-project cost certification.
August 2, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Community and Regional Affairs can, under this section, condition its grants to the regional authorities on the authorities’ compliance with AS

18.55.996(i)

.
August 2, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Community and Regional Affairs is not compelled to limit its grants to those regional housing authorities showing compliance with the auditing requirement of AS

18.55.996(i)

, though the department may in its discretion, and probably should as a matter of policy, so limit its grants.
It follows that the department may and should refuse to make grants to authorities whose audits reveal problems.
August 2, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Grant administrators may authorize the use of grant proceeds to reimburse a grant recipient for allowable expenses incurred before grant approval. March 24, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Expenses incurred before the enactment of an appropriation to fund the grant program may be authorized if, in the grant administrator’s discretion, expenditure approval substantially promotes the fundamental program objectives. March 24, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

The limitations stated in subsections (b) and (c) on use of grant proceeds do not reflect a specific legislative intent to prohibit the use of grant funds for the reimbursement of eligible, pre-award costs. March 24, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.